Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Chapter 5. Wills and Testaments

§ 91-5-1.
Who may execute; signature; attestation.

Every person eighteen (18) years of age or older, being of sound and disposing mind, shall have power, by last will and testament, or codicil in writing, to devise all the estate, right, title and interest in possession, reversion, or remainder, which he or she hath, or at the time of his or her death shall have, of, in, or to lands, tenements, hereditaments, or annuities, or rents charged upon or issuing out of them, or goods and chattels, and personal estate of any description whatever, provided such last will and testament, or codicil, be signed by the testator or testatrix, or by some other person in his or her presence and by his or her express direction. Moreover, if not wholly written and subscribed by himself or herself, it shall be attested by two (2) or more credible witnesses in the presence of the testator or testatrix.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (14); 1857, ch. 60, art. 34; 1871, § 2388; 1880, § 1262; 1892, § 4488; 1906, § 5078; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3366; 1930, § 3550; 1942, § 657; Laws, 1970, ch. 324, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1973).

§ 91-5-3.
Revocations.

A devise so made, or any clause thereof, shall not be revocable but by the testator or testatrix destroying, canceling, or obliterating the same, or causing it to be done in his or her presence, or by subsequent will, codicil, or declaration, in writing, made and executed. Every last will and testament made when the testator or testatrix had no child living, wherein any child he or she might have is not provided for or not mentioned, if at the time of his or her death he or she have a child, or if the testator leave his wife enceinte of a child who shall be born, shall have no effect during the life of any such after-born child and shall be void unless the child die without having been married, or without leaving issue capable of inheriting, and before he or she shall have attained twenty-one years. The estate, both real and personal, so devised shall descend to such child in the same manner as if the testator or testatrix had died intestate, subject, nevertheless, to the bequests made in the last will and testament in case of the death of such child before marriage, or without issue capable of inheriting, and under the age of twenty-one years. When a testator shall leave children born and his wife enceinte, the posthumous child or children, if unprovided for by settlement and neither provided for nor disinherited, but only pretermitted, by the last will and testament, shall succeed to the same portion of the father’s estate as such child or children would have been entitled to if the father had died intestate, towards raising which portion the devisees and legatees shall contribute proportionably out of the parts devised and bequeathed to them by the same will and testament.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (15); 1857, ch. 60, art. 35; 1871, § 2389; 1880, § 1263; 1892, § 4489; 1906, § 5079; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3367; 1930, § 3551; 1942, § 658.

§ 91-5-5.
Children born after making of the will.

If a testator or testatrix, having a child or children born at the time of making and publishing his or her last will and testament, shall, at his or her death, leave a child or children born after the making and publishing such last will and testament, the child or children so after-born, if unprovided for by settlement and neither provided for nor disinherited, but only pretermitted, by the last will and testament, shall succeed to the same portion of the father’s or mother’s estate as such child or children would have been entitled to if the father or mother had died intestate, towards raising which portion the devisees and legatees shall contribute proportionately out of the parts devised and bequeathed to them by the same will and testament, in the same manner as is provided in the case of posthumous children.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (16); 1857, ch. 60, art. 36; 1871, § 2390; 1880, § 1264; 1892, § 4490; 1906, § 5080; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3368; 1930, § 3352; 1942, § 659.

§ 91-5-7.
Bequests not to lapse in certain cases.

Whenever any estate of any kind shall or may be devised or bequeathed by the last will and testament of any testator or testatrix to any person being a child or descendant of such testator or testatrix, and such devisee or legatee shall, during the lifetime of such testator or testatrix, die testate or intestate, leaving a child or children, or one or more descendants of a child or children, who shall survive such testator or testatrix, in that case, such devise or legacy to such person so situated as above mentioned, and dying in the lifetime of the testator or testatrix, shall not lapse, but the estate so devised or bequeathed shall vest in such child or children, descendant or descendants, of such devisee or legatee in the same manner as if a legatee or devisee had survived the testator or testatrix and had died intestate.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (17); 1857, ch. 60, art. 37; 1871, § 2391; 1880, § 1265; 1892, § 4491; 1906, § 5081; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3369; 1930, § 3553; 1942, § 660.

§ 91-5-9.
Devise to witness void.

If any person be a subscribing witness to a will wherein any devise or bequest is made to him and the will cannot otherwise be proven, such devise or bequest shall be void, and the witness shall be competent as to the residue of the will as if a devise or bequest had not been made to him, and he may be compelled to testify. If such witness would have been entitled to any share of the testator’s estate in case the will were not established, then so much of such share shall be saved to the witness as shall not exceed the value of the devise or bequest made to him in the will.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (27); 1857, ch. 60, art. 45; 1871, § 1101; 1880, § 1973; 1892, § 1826; 1906, § 2001; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1666; 1930, § 3554; 1942, § 661.

§ 91-5-11.
Devise or bequest to trustee.

A devise or bequest in a will duly executed pursuant to the provisions of Section 91-5-1 of Mississippi Code of 1972 may be made to the trustee of a trust which is evidenced by a written instrument in existence when the will is made and which is identified in the will. Such devise or bequest shall not be invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or both, by the settlor or any other person or persons; nor because the trust instrument or any amendment thereto was not executed in the manner required for wills; nor because the trust was amended after execution of the will. Unless the will provides otherwise, such devise or bequest shall operate to dispose of the property under the terms and provisions of the instrument creating the trust, including any amendments or modifications in writing made at any time before or after the making of the will and before the death of the testator, and the property shall not be deemed held under a testamentary trust. An entire revocation of the trust prior to the testator’s death shall invalidate the devise or bequest.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all devises or bequests made in any will duly executed according to said section of any testator dying after May 6, 1958, whether the will is executed before or after that date.

The term “will” in this section shall include and refer to the term “codicil”.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 661.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 240, §§ 1-3, eff. upon passage (approved May 6, 1958).

§ 91-5-13.
Creditor competent witness to will.

Any creditor shall be a competent subscribing witness to a last will and testament; but any special provision in favor of such creditor in the will, either by admitting the debt or by providing for its payment or by giving it a preference, shall be void, and such claim shall stand as though the provision had not been made.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (44); 1857, ch. 60, art. 46; 1871, § 1102; 1880, § 1974; 1892, § 1827; 1906, § 2002; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1667; 1930, § 3555; 1942, § 662.

§ 91-5-15.
Nuncupative wills.

A nuncupative will shall not be established unless it be made in the time of the last sickness of the deceased at his or her habitation or where he or she hath resided for ten days next preceding the time of his or her death, except when such person is taken sick from home and die before his or her return to such habitation, nor where the value bequeathed exceeds One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) unless it be proved by two witnesses that the testator or testatrix called on some person present to take notice or bear testimony that such is his or her will, or words to that effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (18); 1857, ch. 60, art. 38; 1871, § 2392; 1880, § 1266; 1892, § 4492; 1906, § 5082; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3370; 1930, § 3556; 1942, § 663.

§ 91-5-17.
Parties in interest to nuncupative will to be cited.

The probate of any nuncupative will shall not be taken, or letters testamentary granted thereon, until after the expiration of fourteen days from the time of the decease of the testator or testatrix, nor until the widow, if any, and next of kin, if resident in this state, have been summoned to contest the same if they think proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (18); 1857, ch. 60, art. 40; 1871, § 2394; 1880, § 1268; 1892, § 4494; 1906, § 5084; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3372; 1930, § 3557; 1942, § 664.

§ 91-5-19.
Nuncupative will not to be proven after six months unless reduced to writing.

After six months have elapsed from the time of speaking the alleged testamentary words, testimony shall not be received to probate a nuncupative will unless the words, or the substance thereof, shall have been reduced to writing within six days after speaking the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (18); 1857, ch. 60, art. 39; 1871, § 2393; 1880, § 1267; 1892, § 4493; 1906, § 5083; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3371; 1930, § 3558; 1942, § 665.

§ 91-5-21.
Members of armed forces and mariners at sea excepted.

Any person of sound mind eighteen years of age or older and being in the armed forces of the United States of America, in active service at home or abroad or being a mariner at sea, may devise, dispose of, and bequeath his goods and chattels or property, real and personal, anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding.

Any will executed prior to July 23, 1968, which conforms to the requirements of this section shall be valid; provided, however, that the testator of said will must be alive at said date.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 1 (21); 1857, ch. 60, art. 41; 1871, § 2395; 1880, § 1269; 1892, § 4495; 1906, § 5085; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3373; 1930, § 3559; 1942, § 666; Laws, 1968, ch. 307, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved July 23, 1968).

§ 91-5-23.
Provision for husband or wife to be in bar.

Any provision by the will of the husband or wife for the other shall be construed to be in bar of any share of the real or personal estate of the testator, unless it be otherwise expressed in the will.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1174; 1892, § 4498; 1906, § 5088; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3376; 1930, § 3560; 1942, § 667.

§ 91-5-25.
Right of spouse to renounce will; form of renunciation; right to intestate share.

When a husband makes his last will and testament and does not make satisfactory provision therein for his wife, she may, at any time within ninety (90) days after the probate of the will, file in the office where probated a renunciation to the following effect, viz.: “I, A B, the widow of C D, hereby renounce the provision made for me by the will of my deceased husband, and elect to take in lieu thereof my legal share of his estate.” Thereupon she shall be entitled to such part of his estate, real and personal, as she would have been entitled to if he had died intestate, except that, even if the husband left no child nor descendant of such, the widow, upon renouncing, shall be entitled to only one-half (1/2) of the real and personal estate of her deceased husband. The husband may renounce the will of his deceased wife under the same circumstances, in the same time and manner, and with the same effect upon his right to share in her estate as herein provided for the widow.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1282; 1880, § 1172; 1892, § 4496; 1906, § 5086; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3374; 1930, § 3561; 1942, § 668; Laws, 1975, ch. 373, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1976.

§ 91-5-27.
Effect of no provision for husband or wife.

If the will of the husband or wife shall not make any provision for the other, the survivor of them shall have the right to share in the estate of the deceased husband or wife, as in case of unsatisfactory provision in the will of the husband or wife for the other of them. In such case a renunciation of the will shall not be necessary, but the rights of the survivor shall be as if the will had contained a provision that was unsatisfactory and it had been renounced.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1173; 1892, § 4497; 1906, § 5087; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3375; 1930, § 3562; 1942, § 669.

§ 91-5-29.
Effect of wife or husband having separate estate.

In case the wife have a separate property at the time of the death of her husband, equal in value to what would be her lawful portion of her husband’s real and personal estate, and he have made a will, she shall not be at liberty to signify her dissent to the will or to renounce any provision or bequest therein in her favor and elect to take her portion of his estate. If her separate property be not equal in value to what would be the value of her portion of her husband’s estate, then she may signify her dissent to the will, as in other cases provided by law, and claim to have the deficiency made up to her, notwithstanding the will. The court in which the will is probated may appoint three commissioners to ascertain, by valuation of the estate, what her lawful portion thereof would be worth; and the commissioners shall also value her own separate estate and report their valuation to the court. Whereupon the court shall make the proper order for allowing her to share in her husband’s real and personal estate to make up the deficiency after the following rule: if her separate property be equal in value to two thirds of what she would be entitled to, she shall have one third of her lawful portion of the land and one third of what would be her distributive share of the personalty; if her separate property be worth half in value what she would be entitled to, then she shall be entitled to half her lawful portion of real estate and half of what would be her distributive share of the personalty; if her separate property be worth only one third in value what she would be entitled to, then she shall be entitled to two thirds of her lawful portion of real estate and two thirds of what would be her distributive share in the personalty. This section shall not preclude or prevent any married woman from renouncing the provisions of her husband’s will and electing to take her lawful portion if her separate property do not amount in value to one fifth of what she would be entitled to. This section shall apply to a husband renouncing the will of his wife, and shall govern as to his right to share in her estate in such case.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 40, art. 30; 1871, § 1789; 1880, § 1175; 1892, § 4499; 1906, § 5089; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3377; 1930, § 3563; 1942, § 670.

§ 91-5-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1993, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1993).

[Codes, 1892, § 4501; 1906, § 5091; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3379; 1930, § 3565; 1942, § 671; Laws, 1940, ch. 318; Laws, 1988, ch. 489, § 1]

§ 91-5-33.
Person who kills another not to take under his will.

If any person shall wilfully cause or procure the death of another in any manner, he shall not take the property, or any part thereof, real or personal, of such other under any will, testament, or codicil. Any devise to such person shall be void and, as to the property so devised, the decedent shall be deemed to have died intestate.

This shall not defeat the title of a bona fide purchaser for value of the property so devised, who acquired the same after one year from the probation of the will without notice that the person to whom the same was devised so caused or procured the death of the testator.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4502; 1906, § 5092; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3380; 1930, § 3566; 1942, § 672.

§ 91-5-35.
Will devising real property admitted to probate as muniment of title only; rights of interested parties unaffected.

When a person dies testate owning at the time of death real property in the State of Mississippi and his will purports to devise such realty, then said will may be admitted to probate, as a muniment of title only, by petition signed and sworn to by all beneficiaries named in the will, and the spouse of such deceased person if such spouse is not named as a beneficiary in the will, without the necessity of administration or the appointment of an executor or administrator with the will annexed, provided it be shown by said petition that:

The value of the decedent’s personal estate in the State of Mississippi at the time of his or her death, exclusive of any interest in real property, did not exceed the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), exclusive of exempt property; and

All known debts of the decedent and his estate have been paid, including estate and income taxes, if any.

If any beneficiary to any will admitted to probate pursuant to this section shall be under a disability, then the petition may be signed for him by one of his parents or his legal guardian.

The probate of a will under this section shall in no way affect the rights of any interested party to petition for a formal administration of the estate or to contest the will as provided by Section 91-7-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, or the right of anyone desiring to contest a will presented for probate as provided by Section 91-7-21, or as otherwise provided by law.

This section shall apply to wills admitted to probate from and after July 1, 1984, notwithstanding that the testator or testatrix may have died on or before July 1, 1984.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 385; Laws, 1984, ch. 467; Laws, 1989, ch. 582, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.